Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-445
Obstructing ditch, drain, or watercourse; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to obstruct in any manner the flow of water in any ditch, drain or watercourse constructed, improved or used by such drainage district, or to injure or disturb in any manner any dike, levee, or other work constructed in whole or in part, or owned by any drainage district. Any person violating any provision of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall upon conviction be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, and shall stand committed until the fine and costs are paid. He shall also be liable to the drainage district and to any person injured for all damages sustained by reason of such violation.

Laws 1909, c. 150, § 1, p. 534;

R.S.1913, § 1909;

C.S.1922, § 1857;

C.S.1929, § 31-545;

R.S.1943, § 31-445.